Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.282

Industrial welfare committee abolished—Transfer of powers, duties, and functions.

The industrial welfare committee established by this chapter is abolished. All powers, duties, and functions of the committee are transferred to the director of labor and industries.

[ 1982 c 163 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.